test/src/morphology/V-xadasj_gt-norm.yaml
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: хаданархав
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: хаданархар
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: хаданархада
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: хаданархамиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: хаданархариʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: хаданархадиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: хаданархаваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: хаданархараˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: хаданархадоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: хаданархахаюн
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: хаданархахаюд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: хаданархахаюда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: хаданархахаюниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: хаданархахаюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: хаданархахаюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: хаданархахаюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: хаданархахаюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: хаданархахаюдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: хаданархын
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: хаданархыд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: хаданархыда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: хаданархыниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: хаданархыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: хаданархыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: хаданархынаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: хаданархыдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: хаданархыдоʼ 
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg1: хаданархадамзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg2: хаданарханась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg3: хаданархась 
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu1: хаданарханинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu2: хаданархадинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu3: хаданархаханзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl1: хаданархаваць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl2: хаданархадаць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl3: хаданархаць  
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: хаданархавась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: хаданархарась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: хаданархадась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: хаданархаминзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: хаданархаринзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: хаданархадинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: хаданархаваць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: хаданархараць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: хаданархадонзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: хаданархахаюнась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: хаданархахаюдась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: хаданархахаюдась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: хаданархахаюнинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: хаданархахаюдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: хаданархахаюдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: хаданархахаюнаць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: хаданархахаюдаць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: хаданархахаюдонзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: хаданархынась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: хаданархыдась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: хаданархыдась
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: хаданархынинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: хаданархыдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: хаданархыдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: хаданархынаць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: хаданархыдаць
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: хаданархыдонзь      
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg1: хадавэрхадмʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg2: хадавэрхан
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg3: хадавэрха
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu1: хадавэрханиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu2: хадавэрхадиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu3: хадавэрхахаʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl1: хадавэрхаваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl2: хадавэрхадаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl3: хадавэрхаˮ 
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадавэрхав
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадавэрхар
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадавэрхада
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадавэрхамиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадавэрхариʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu3+OcSg3: хадавэрхадиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадавэрхаваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадавэрхараˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl3+OcSg3: хадавэрхадоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадавэрхахаюн
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадавэрхахаюд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадавэрхахаюда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадавэрхахаюниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадавэрхахаюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадавэрхахаюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадавэрхахаюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадавэрхахаюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадавэрхахаюдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадавэрхын
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg2+OcPl3: хадавэрхыд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадавэрхыда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадавэрхыниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадавэрхыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадавэрхыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадавэрхынаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадавэрхыдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадавэрхыдоʼ  
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1: хадавандархадмʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2: хадавандархан
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3: хадавандарха
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1: хадавандарханиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2: хадавандархадиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3: хадавандархахаʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1: хадавандархаваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2: хадавандархадаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3: хадавандархаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадавандархав
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадавандархар
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадавандархада
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадавандархамиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадавандархариʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3+OcSg3: хадавандархадиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадавандархаваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадавандархараˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3+OcSg3: хадавандархадоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадавандархахаюн
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадавандархахаюд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадавандархахаюда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадавандархахаюниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадавандархахаюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадавандархахаюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадавандархахаюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадавандархахаюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадавандархахаюдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадавандархын
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2+OcPl3: хадавандархыд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадавандархыда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадавандархыниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадавандархыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадавандархыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадавандархынаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадавандархыдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадавандархыдоʼ    
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg1: хадаванӈгабядмʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg2: хадаванӈгабян
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg3: хадаванӈгабя
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu1: хадаванӈгабяниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu2: хадаванӈгабядиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu3: хадаванӈгабяхаʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl1: хадаванӈгабяваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl2: хадаванӈгабядаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl3: хадаванӈгабяˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадаванӈгабяв
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадаванӈгабяр
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадаванӈгабяда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадаванӈгабямиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадаванӈгабяриʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu3+OcSg3: хадаванӈгабядиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадаванӈгабяваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадаванӈгабяраˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl3+OcSg3: хадаванӈгабядоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадаванӈгабяхаюн
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадаванӈгабяхаюд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадаванӈгабяхаюда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадаванӈгабяхаюниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадаванӈгабяхаюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадаванӈгабяхаюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадаванӈгабяхаюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадаванӈгабяхаюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадаванӈгабяхаюдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадаванӈгабин
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg2+OcPl3: хадаванӈгабид
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадаванӈгабида
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадаванӈгабиниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадаванӈгабидиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадаванӈгабидиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадаванӈгабинаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадаванӈгабидаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадаванӈгабидоʼ 
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1: хадарахавэдмʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2: хадарахавэн
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3: хадарахавы
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1: хадарахавэниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2: хадарахавэдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3: хадарахавэхэʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1: хадарахавэваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2: хадарахавэдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3: хадарахавыˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадарахавэв
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадарахавэр
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадарахавэда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадарахавэмиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадарахавэриʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3+OcSg3: хадарахавэдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадарахавэваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадарахавэраˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3+OcSg3: хадарахавэдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадарахавэхэюн
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадарахавэхэюд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадарахавэхэюда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадарахавэхэюниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадарахавэхэюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадарахавэхэюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадарахавэхэюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадарахавэхэюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадарахавэхэюдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадарахавын
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2+OcPl3: хадарахавыд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадарахавыда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадарахавыниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадарахавыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадарахавыдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадарахавынаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадарахавыдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадарахавыдоʼ                     
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg1: хадавнадмʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg2: хадавнан
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg3: хадавна
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu1: хадавнаниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu2: хадавнадиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu3: хадавнахаʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl1: хадавнаваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl2: хадавнадаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl3: хадавнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадавнав
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадавнар
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадавнада
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадавнамиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадавнариʼ
